Connecticut, session 2026, HB05148.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Department of Education shall
study the effectiveness of the method of addressing racial imbalance
specified in sections 10-226a to 10-226e, inclusive, of the general statutes
and the regulations adopted pursuant to said sections. Such study shall
include, but not be limited to, (1) an examination of the effectiveness of
various strategies implemented to correct racial imbalances in the long
term and short term, (2) a cost benefit analysis of implementing such
strategies, (3) the impact on pupils of racial minorities, as described in
section 10-226a of the general statutes, as a result of such strategies, such
as access to neighborhood schools and educational outcomes, and (4)
suggestions for alternative methods for correcting racial imbalances.
(b) Not later than January 1, 2028, the Department of Education shall
submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education on the
findings of the study conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section.
Sec. 2. Section 10-226b of the general statutes, as amended by section
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5148
28 of public act 26-1, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Whenever the State Board of Education finds that racial imbalance
exists in a public school, it shall notify in writing the board of education
having jurisdiction over said school that such finding has been made,
except the State Board of Education shall not notify a board of education
of such finding until July 1, [2030] 2028.
(b) As used in sections 10-226a to 10-226e, inclusive, "racial
imbalance" means a condition wherein the proportion of pupils of racial
minorities in all of the grades of a public school of the secondary level
or below taken together substantially exceeds or falls substantially short
of the proportion of such public school pupils in all of the same grades
of the school district in which said school is situated taken together.
Sec. 3. Section 10-226c of the general statutes, as amended by section
29 of public act 26-1, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Any board of education receiving notification of the existence of
racial imbalance as specified in section 10-226b, as amended by public
act 26-1 and this act, shall forthwith prepare a plan to correct such
imbalance and file a copy of said plan with the State Board of Education,
except such board of education shall not be required to prepare and file
said plan until July 1, [2030] 2028. Said plan may be limited to
addressing the imbalance existing at any school and need not result in a
district-wide plan or district-wide pupil reassignment. A school district
may request an extension of time in cases in which the number of
students causing said imbalance is fewer than five students at a school.
(b) Any plan submitted by the board of education of any town under
sections 10-226a to 10-226e, inclusive, shall include any proposed
changes in existing school attendance districts, the location of proposed
school building sites as related to the problem, any proposed additions
to existing school buildings and all other means proposed for the
correction of said racial imbalance. The plan shall include projections of
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5148
the expected racial composition of all public schools in the district. The
plan may include provision for cooperation with other school districts
to assist in the correction of racial imbalance.
Sec. 4. Section 10-226d of the general statutes, as amended by section
30 of public act 26-1, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
Upon receipt of any plan required under the provisions of subsection
(b) of section 10-226c, as amended by public act 26-1 and this act, the
State Board of Education shall review said plan. If it determines that the
plan is satisfactory, it shall approve the plan and shall provide to the
board of education such assistance and services as may be available. The
board of education shall submit annual reports on the implementation
of the approved plan, as the State Board of Education may require. The
State Board of Education shall not take action on any plan received on
or after July 1, 2024, until July 1, [2030] 2028.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 10-226b
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 10-226c
Sec. 4 July 1, 2026 10-226d
ED Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3